Georgia, session 2025_26, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 50 the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department of
Community Affairs, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
S. B. 310
- 1 -

LC 52 0807
"ARTICLE 14
50-8-400.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'CHANGE Task Force' or 'task force' means the Creating Hope and a New Georgia
for Everyone Task Force as provided for in this article.
(2) 'Commissioner' means the commissioner of community affairs.
(3) 'Department' means the Department of Community Affairs.
50-8-401.
There is established the Creating Hope and a New Georgia for Everyone or CHANGE Task
Force for the purpose of examining complex issues facing urban, suburban, and rural
communities in this state; bringing together civic, community, business, and government
leaders to discuss solutions focused on labor and community development; recommending
such solutions to civic, community, business, and government leaders; and, to the extent
possible, facilitating the implementation of such solutions.
50-8-402.
(a) The CHANGE Task Force shall consist of 13 members as follows:
(1) Four members appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a civic or
community leader of the City of Atlanta or of the County of Fulton, DeKalb, Cobb,
Gwinnett, or Clayton; one of whom shall be an employer of more than 250 employees in
this state; one of whom shall be a representative of a public technical school, vocational
school, college, university, or other institution of postsecondary education in this state;
and one of whom shall be a representative of a private technical school, vocational
school, college, university, or other institution of postsecondary education in this state;
S. B. 310
- 2 -

LC 52 0807
(2) Four members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of
whom shall be a civic or community leader outside of metro Atlanta; one of whom shall
be an employer of 250 employees or fewer in this state; and two of whom shall be
members of the House of Representatives;
(3) Four members appointed by the President of the Senate, one of whom shall be a civic
or community leader outside of metro Atlanta; one of whom shall be an employer of ten
employees or fewer in this state; and two of whom shall be members of the Senate; and
(4) The commissioner of community affairs or his or her designee.
(b) Each member of the task force shall be appointed to serve for a term of two years or
until his or her successor is duly appointed, except the members of the General Assembly,
who shall serve until the completion of their current terms of office. A member may be
appointed to succeed himself or herself on the task force. If a member of the task force is
an elected or appointed official, the member or his or her designee shall be removed from
the task force if the member no longer serves as such elected or appointed official.
Vacancies in the task force shall be filled by appointment in the manner of the original
appointment.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chairperson of the task force. The chairperson shall
call all meetings of the task force and preside over such meetings. The task force may elect
other officers as it deems necessary.
(d) The task force shall be attached to the department for administrative purposes only.
The department shall provide staff support for the task force and shall use any funds
specifically appropriated to it to support the work of the task force.
50-8-403.
(a) The CHANGE Task Force may conduct meetings at such places and times as it deems
necessary or convenient to enable it to exercise fully and effectively its powers, perform
S. B. 310
- 3 -

LC 52 0807
its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this article. The task force shall
meet at least quarterly and at the call of the chairperson.
(b) A quorum for transacting business shall be a majority of the members of the task force.
(c) Any legislative members of the task force shall receive the allowances provided for in
Code Section 28-1-8. Citizen members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the
amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21, as well as the mileage or
transportation allowance authorized for state employees. Members of the task force who
are state officials or state employees, excluding legislative members, shall receive no
compensation for their services on the task force, but they shall be reimbursed for expenses
incurred by them in the performance of their duties as members of the task force in the
same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state officials or
state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state
officials and state employees shall come from funds appropriated or otherwise available
to their respective departments. All other funds necessary to carry out the provisions of
this article shall come from funds appropriated to the Senate and the House of
Representatives.
50-8-404.
(a) The CHANGE Task Force shall:
(1) Identify the most important issues facing communities in this state through
stakeholder input and public hearings, research, data collection, evaluation, and analysis;
(2) Annually prioritize a singular issue that the task force will examine;
(3) Define the root cause or causes of such prioritized issue;
(4) Brainstorm solutions to the prioritized issue focusing on labor and community
development; and
S. B. 310
- 4 -

LC 52 0807
(5) Recommend solutions, including but not limited to the introduction of or changes to
legislation, programs, plans, policies, or strategies, to the public and to civic, community,
business, and government leaders, as applicable.
(b) The CHANGE Task Force shall have the power to:
(1) Conduct surveys or studies, hold public meetings, collect data, or take any other
action the task force deems necessary to fulfill its responsibilities;
(2) Request and receive data from state agencies to the greatest extent allowed by state
and federal law;
(3) Accept any public or private grants, devises, and bequests;
(4) Authorize entering into contracts or agreements through the task force's chairperson
necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties; and
(5) Establish rules and procedures for conducting the business of the task force.
(c) Subject to appropriations, the task force shall establish a grant program for the
provision of funds to applicants for the purpose of labor and community development to
address a prioritized issue facing a community in this state. To the extent possible, grants
100 shall be awarded in a variety of geographic areas of the state.
101 (d) The task force shall be authorized to retain the services of attorneys, consultants,
102 subject matter experts, economists, budget analysts, data analysts, statisticians, and other
103 individuals or organizations as determined appropriate by the task force.
104 (e) Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the task force shall submit a detailed
105 report to the Governor and notify members of the General Assembly of the availability of
106 such report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient. The annual
107 report shall contain the task force's findings and recommendations regarding issues facing
108 communities in this state and shall evaluate the impact of task force activities. Prior to
109 dissolution, the task force shall send a final report to the General Assembly summarizing
110 its activities and making its final recommendations. The annual reports and final report
S. B. 310
- 5 -

LC 52 0807
111 shall be published on the department's internet website and shall be made publicly
112 available.
113 50-8-405.
114 This article shall be automatically repealed on June 30, 2031, unless continued in effect by
115 the General Assembly prior to that date."
116 SECTION 2.
117 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
118 without such approval.
119 SECTION 3.
120 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 310
- 6 -